Utah statutes.
36-25-102.   Rural Development Legislative Liaison Committee -- Creation -- Membership -- Chairs -- Salary -- Expenses.

(1)  There is created the Rural Development Legislative Liaison Committee composed of 11 members as follows:

(a)  four members of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate, no more than two of whom shall be from the same political party; and

(b)  seven members from the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives, no more than four of whom shall be from the same political party.

(2)  Senators and representatives from nonrural legislative districts may be considered for membership on the committee.

(3) (a)  The president of the Senate shall designate a member of the Senate appointed under Subsection (1)(a) as a cochair.

(b)  The speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate a member of the House of Representatives appointed under Subsection (1)(b) as a cochair of the committee.

(4)  Salaries and expenses of the members of the committee shall be paid in accordance with Section 36-2-2 and Joint Rule 15.03.

